Utah statutes.
32A-7-105.   Bond.
(1)  Any applicant for a single event permit shall post a cash or corporate
surety bond in the penal sum of $1,000 payable to the department, which the
applicant has procured and must maintain for so long as the permit is in
effect.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon the permittee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the
commission.
(3)  No part of any cash or corporate bond so posted may be withdrawn during
the period the permit is in effect.  A bond filed by the permittee may be
forfeited if the permit is revoked.
